Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-3415
Estimator, technician, or other similar titles, defined.

Estimator, technician, or other similar titles means a person who through training or experience is performing tasks associated with the practice of architecture or engineering under the supervision of an architect or professional engineer, respectively.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 15;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 13.